Utah statutes.
31A-22-1413.   Claim information.
If a claim under a long-term care insurance contract is denied, within 60 days
of the date a written request by the policyholder or a representative of a
policyholder is filed with the insurer, the insurer shall:
(1)  provide a written explanation of the reason for the denial; and
(2)  make available all information directly related to the denial.
